src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Tokelauan language nouns inflect in number and cases.

LEXICON Nouns
nounstems ;
n-redup ;


LEXICON n-redup
@U.noun.sg@ redupnouns ; ! sg nouns
@U.noun.pl@ redupnouns ; ! pl nouns


!### Suffixes

LEXICON locnoun 
+N+Loc: # ;

LEXICON n
+N+Sg: # ;

LEXICON nredupsuf
@U.noun.sg@+N+Sg:@U.noun.sg@ # ;
@U.noun.pl@+N+Pl:@U.noun.pl@ # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
