src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nounstems
uta locnoun " The islets on the far" ;
fafo locnoun " Outside, out of" ;
fale locnoun "Communal settlement," ;
gāuta locnoun " 1. Shore, land, (from" ;
gakiata locnoun " East. (cf. gaki and" ;
gātai locnoun " 1. Sea, shore (from" ;
kinā locnoun " There, at that place" ;
kinei locnoun " Here (near speaker)." ;
kō locnoun " There, at that place" ;
lalo locnoun " Down, below, under," ;
lalō locnoun " P art or area of an atoll" ;
loto locnoun " 1. Inside, in. Hau ki" ;
lotofale locnoun " (of a house) The inside" ;
lotofenua locnoun " The inland area." ;
lototonu locnoun " Centre, middle." ;
luga locnoun " On, onto, in an up­" ;
mātū locnoun " n o rth . Fano koe ki mātu" ;
haute locnoun " [Eng. south] South." ;
hahae' locnoun " East. N afolau nā vaka" ;
hihifo locnoun " West. Ko motu o" ;
tōata locnoun " W est. (cf. to 2 and ata2)." ;
tua locnoun " n o u n . 1. Space or position" ;
tuāfafo locnoun " n oun. O utside, exterior o f" ;
tuafenua locnoun " 1. A rea o f atoll land" ;
vao locnoun " Forest, bush just o u t­" ;
aitu n "ghost, spirit. E" ;
au n "Current, flow. N" ;
aufai n "Bunch of bananas." ;
āumāga n "The group comprising" ;
afato n "Sam. ‘afato G" ;
afifi n "Parcel, package. N" ;
aga n "and-span (used" ;
agahala n "Sin. (lit. wrong" ;
agiagi n "Eng. onion. Onion." ;
akāniu n "Rooto f a" ;
akoakoga n "Education, training. E" ;
alaga n "Buoyancy. K o" ;
alahitepu n "Staircase. F m" ;
ālio n "(Bb.). Silver. Ko" ;
alofilima n "Palm of" ;
āmafua n "(Sp. o f" ;
an n "Slice (of raw" ;
apatānoa n "Dish, vessel. Valu" ;
apohetolo n "(Bb.). Apostle. Ko" ;
aho n "huge, clumsy," ;
atamai n "Intelligence, wisdom, know­" ;
ato n "Suitcase. (Also" ;
atumata n "Row of eyes" ;
ava n "A channel" ;
āvalevale n "Confusion, mix-up. E" ;
eka n "Eng. acre. Acre." ;
epaepa n "Small sleeping mat" ;
loa n "The name o" ;
ika n "nother name" ;
ikapō n "(Sp. of shark)." ;
iliafi n "Chain-saw (or any" ;
inihi n "Eng. inch. Inch." ;
ipumālamalama n "Tumbler, glass. Kaumai" ;
ihi n "Crack, fissure. E" ;
itūpō n "Part of night," ;
ivitū n "Backbone, spine. Fofo" ;
ōfagāman n ". Bird’s nest." ;
oge n "Famine. Kua lavea" ;
ōlega n "Request. Ko te" ;
ōmeka n "Bb. omega. Omega" ;
oho n "Provision of food" ;
ū n "Arrow. Ko" ;
uafiti n "Haem m orrhoid(s)." ;
ui n "young bird," ;
ufi n "Common yam (.Dioscorea" ;
ufumea n "(Sp. of fish)." ;
ugatea n "hite herm" ;
ukavavae n "Cotton fishing line." ;
ulili n "Whistle. Kāfai e" ;
Uluakiutuā n "The seventh month" ;
ulugāfafin n "Pair o f" ;
ulumoega n "Pile of mats" ;
ulutuki n "giant grouper" ;
un n "Line or row" ;
uta n "Locative noun. The" ;
ututau n "Bullet, cartridge. Nae" ;
faikili n "(Sp. of fish)." ;
faiva n "Gambling on horse" ;
fāua n "Saliva. H olo" ;
fāfālua n "(Sp. o f" ;
fagafaga n "Sideboards, side-whiskers. Kua" ;
fakaaoga n "kind of" ;
fakaata n "irror, looking" ;
fakain n "The act o" ;
fakaohoohoga n "Temptation. Ko te" ;
fakafaufau n "Feeling o f" ;
fakalāin n "Fasting. Kua uma" ;
Fakalima n "The fifth" ;
fakamāulalo n "Humility, lowliness, (lit." ;
fakamahin n ". M agistrate," ;
fakapatu n "Bun (the manner" ;
fakaputuga n "Pile, stack," ;
fakahologa n "Order, list, programme." ;
fakatafiti n "The ridging for" ;
fakatānoa n "Sink, trough. Fufulu" ;
fakatomuaga n "Introduction, preliminary" ;
fakatumu n "Funnel, filler. Fakaaoga" ;
fakavavau n "Everlasting, eternity. E" ;
faleuaealehi n "Radio station. K" ;
falemeli n "Post Office. E" ;
faletalavai n "Dispensary. E tala" ;
fāli n "Anger, displeasure. Kua" ;
fanaufai n "(of either the" ;
fanua n "Placenta, afterbirth. E" ;
fātele n "Action song" ;
fātuga n "set of" ;
fatupuke n "The" ;
fefete n "Baking-powder, yeast. Kaumai" ;
fekefekeifala n "(Sp. o f" ;
fenuātai n "Area o f" ;
fetū n "Curse. Ko tana" ;
fiakai n "Hunger. Kua uma" ;
figota n "General term" ;
finauga n "Argum ent." ;
foeuli n "Steering oar," ;
fōki n "Present, gift, offering." ;
fonuake n "The turtle which" ;
fuaikupu n "Sentence (of" ;
fuafuāika n "Small fish, little" ;
fuata n "Crop. E lahi" ;
fuimea n "Gills. Kave kehe" ;
fuluhā n "feeling o" ;
fuhuaga n "Fighting. Vavao" ;
gaihi n "Slit, crack. E" ;
gafa n "Fathom , (n.b." ;
gākau-lahi n "Large intestine. E" ;
galugalu n "Wavelets, ripples. Ko" ;
gatukofu n "Old shirt." ;
gū n "Squid. (A long," ;
gutuhiko n "(Sp. of fish)." ;
kaiman n "Bird catching expedition" ;
kau n "General term for" ;
kaufaipehe n "Choir. F fa" ;
kaugutu n "(of cup, bowl," ;
kaulemu n "(of humans only)." ;
kaupoe n "Eng. cowboy. Cowboy." ;
kautaliga n "Ear lobe. E" ;
kafa n "(Sp. of fish)." ;
kafu n "Cloth, material. H" ;
kakapa n "Reach. E loa" ;
kalapu n "Eng. club. ." ;
kālele n "Large type of" ;
kalikatua n "Eng. caricature Funny" ;
kāmutoa n "A species" ;
kapa n "o f" ;
kāpoti n "Eng. cupb oard" ;
katafa n "(Sp. o f" ;
kātun n "Eng. carton. Carton." ;
keke n "Eng. cake. C" ;
kehi n "Eng. gas Gas," ;
kietāpulu n "Shawl, bedsheet. Pulupulu" ;
kiligan n "A skin rash" ;
kin n "Stick specially used" ;
kofekofe n "The stiff binding" ;
kogāika n "Portion o" ;
kogāvae n "Thigh (leg. from" ;
koli n "dish prepared" ;
koma n "Comma. Eng. comma." ;
kopi n "Eng. copy. Copy." ;
kotā n "Sound made by" ;
kuku n "Hold, grasp. N" ;
kumikumia n "fish species" ;
kutufiti n "Flea (lit. flicking" ;
iaihen n "Eng. licence. Licence." ;
laugatahi n "(of land). Level" ;
laumuli n "The beater or" ;
lafupovi n "Herd o" ;
lagomeli n "Honey bee." ;
lali n "Gum (of a" ;
lahi n "Size. H" ;
lega n "The yolk of" ;
lilipi n "technique for" ;
 n "Ant. E toho" ;
 n "enstruation. E" ;
luāumu n "The nest o" ;
lupohama n "(Sp. of fish)." ;
mau n "evolution, rebellion." ;
māfiafia n "hickness. E" ;
makohi n "Scratch m ark." ;
mālamalamaga n "nderstanding. He" ;
malū n "(o f m" ;
man n "(o f G" ;
man n "A curved piece" ;
māhiahi n "m b" ;
mata-o-ika n "he leading" ;
mataku n "Fear. £ tagi" ;
matatupu n "n" ;
mātūtū n "ryness. Ko" ;
melen n "Eng. m elon." ;
mita n "Eng. m" ;
molali n "(Sp. o f" ;
mua n "Stripe (on a" ;
mulifagu n "B o" ;
mumuhu n "hisper. Na" ;
namo n "agoon. Kua" ;
niukilia n "Eng. nuclear N" ;
nota n "Eng. note. M" ;
paega n "m an-m" ;
pāga n "P artn" ;
palataiho n "Eng. paradise. P" ;
paluloa n "A variety" ;
pānupan n "Smear, smudge. Fufulu" ;
pahā n "Eng. bazaar. Bazaar." ;
pātukilaufala n "(Sp. o f" ;
pelega n "Thing given as" ;
pepa n "Small discs of" ;
pikitaga n "S.th. used for" ;
piho n "(of animals)." ;
pogi n "Game of blindfold." ;
polo n "Eng. ball. ." ;
pohin n "Eng. boatswain. Boatswain," ;
puapua n "species of" ;
pukupuku n "Shortness, briefness. Na" ;
puligi n "Eng. pudding. Pudding." ;
pulutākele n "Bathing coconut husk" ;
punuāpovi n "Calf," ;
puhaaiha n "Icebox, refrigerator. Fakamālulū" ;
puhitea n "(Sp. o f" ;
hao n "Row of people" ;
hafu n "An arrangem ent" ;
halu n "Broom, rake." ;
hahaga n "Large lengthwise timber" ;
Heoli n "(Bb.). Sheol, hell." ;
helehelega n "Harvest, yield, crop." ;
hiaki n "Eng. cheque. Cheque." ;
hikivaka n "Pallbearers (lit. carriers" ;
hila n "general term" ;
hipi n "Eng. zip. Zip-fastener." ;
hoāliki n "(of a boat)." ;
holigāula n "The type of" ;
hohogo n "he smell" ;
hue n "(Sp. o f" ;
hūkui n "he tw" ;
humufāgota n "(Sp. o f" ;
tāeao n "M orning." ;
taikakahi n "n ab" ;
tau n "rice, cost," ;
taugāika n "channel on" ;
taumuli n "Stern." ;
tāfai n "opm ost" ;
tagai n "ball o" ;
tākaga n "o rp" ;
takuali n "species o" ;
talatala n "Violet Solderfish" ;
talitua n "he fielder" ;
taman n "F ather. E" ;
tanuga n "urial. N" ;
tata n "fish -trap" ;
tein n "G irl, lass." ;
tiākon n "Eng. deacon D" ;
tikatika n "he genital" ;
toi n "Eng. toy Toy." ;
togihala n "aym ent" ;
totoulia n "Bruise, contusion. £" ;
tuahivi n "(o f m" ;
tukeniu n "Very tall coco" ;
tulituli n "fish drive" ;
tuhitala n "Story bo" ;
vaiuli n "ashing blue." ;
vaogatā n "Intractability, disobedience. E" ;
vākilikiliga n "horough exam" ;
vāteatea n "Sky, heaven, space." ;
viki n "Song t" ;
afafine n "daughter of a man" ;
ao n "daylight" ;
fīnauga n "argument" ;
kātoaga n "completion" ;
